Utah statutes.
78A-7-104.   Justice court judge authority.
Justice court judges:
(1)  have the same authority regarding matters within their jurisdiction as
judges of courts of record;
(2)  may issue search warrants and warrants of arrest upon a finding of
probable cause; and
(3)  may conduct proceedings to determine:
(a)  probable cause for any case within their jurisdiction; and
(b)  an accused person's release on bail or his own recognizance.
